tr: ABD kadın ayakkabı numarası: 10; 10 Ekstra Geniş; 10 Orta; 10 Dar; 10 Standart; 10 Geniş; 10,5; 10,5 Ekstra Geniş; 10,5 Orta; 10,5 Dar; 10,5 Standart; 10,5 Geniş; 11; 11 Ekstra Geniş; 11 Orta; 11 Dar; 11 Standart; 11 Geniş; 11,5; 11,5 Ekstra Geniş; 11,5 Orta; 11,5 Dar; 11,5 Standart; 11,5 Geniş; 12; 12 Ekstra Geniş; 12 Orta; 12 Dar; 12 Standart; 12 Geniş; 12,5; 12,5 Ekstra Geniş; 12,5 Orta; 12,5 Dar; 12,5 Standart; 12,5 Geniş; 13; 13 Ekstra Geniş; 13 Orta; 13 Dar; 13 Standart; 13 Geniş; 13,5; 13,5 Ekstra Geniş; 13,5 Orta; 13,5 Dar; 13,5 Standart; 13,5 Geniş; 14; 14 Ekstra Geniş; 14 Orta; 14 Dar; 14 Standart; 14 Geniş; 3,5; 3,5 Ekstra Geniş; 3,5 Orta; 3,5 Dar; 3,5 Standart; 3,5 Geniş; 4; 4 Ekstra Geniş; 4 Orta; 4 Dar; 4 Standart; 4 Geniş; 4,5; 4,5 Ekstra Geniş; 4,5 Orta; 4,5 Dar; 4,5 Standart; 4,5 Geniş; 5; 5 Ekstra Geniş; 5 Orta; 5 Dar; 5 Standart; 5 Geniş; 5,5; 5,5 Ekstra Geniş; 5,5 Orta; 5,5 Dar; 5,5 Standart; 5,5 Geniş; 6; 6 Ekstra Geniş; 6 Orta; 6 Dar; 6 Standart; 6 Geniş; 6,5; 6,5 Ekstra Geniş; 6,5 Orta; 6,5 Dar; 6,5 Standart; 6,5 Geniş; 7; 7 Ekstra Geniş; 7 Orta; 7 Dar; 7 Standart; 7 Geniş; 7,5; 7,5 Ekstra Geniş; 7,5 Orta; 7,5 Dar; 7,5 Standart; 7,5 Geniş; 8; 8 Ekstra Geniş; 8 Orta; 8 Dar; 8 Standart; 8 Geniş; 8,5; 8,5 Ekstra Geniş; 8,5 Orta; 8,5 Dar; 8,5 Standart; 8,5 Geniş; 9; 9 Ekstra Geniş; 9 Orta; 9 Dar; 9 Standart; 9 Geniş; 9,5; 9,5 Ekstra Geniş; 9,5 Orta; 9,5 Dar; 9,5 Standart; 9,5 Geniş; Diğer
es: Número de zapato de mujeres de EE. UU.: 10; 10 extra ancho; 10 medio; 10 estrecho; 10 estándar; 10 ancho; 10,5; 10,5 extra ancho; 10,5 medio; 10,5 estrecho; 10,5 estándar; 10,5 ancho; 11; 11 extra ancho; 11 medio; 11 estrecho; 11 estándar; 11 ancho; 11,5; 11,5 extra ancho; 11,5 medio; 11,5 estrecho; 11,5 estándar; 11,5 ancho; 12; 12 extra ancho; 12 medio; 12 estrecho; 12 estándar; 12 ancho; 12,5; 12,5 extra ancho; 12,5 medio; 12,5 estrecho; 12,5 estándar; 12,5 ancho; 13; 13 extra ancho; 13 medio; 13 estrecho; 13 estándar; 13 ancho; 13,5; 13,5 extra ancho; 13,5 medio; 13,5 estrecho; 13,5 estándar; 13,5 ancho; 14; 14 extra ancho; 14 medio; 14 estrecho; 14 estándar; 14 ancho; 3,5; 3,5 extra ancho; 3,5 medio; 3,5 estrecho; 3,5 estándar; 3,5 ancho; 4; 4 extra ancho; 4 medio; 4 estrecho; 4 estándar; 4 ancho; 4,5; 4,5 extra ancho; 4,5 medio; 4,5 estrecho; 4,5 estándar; 4,5 ancho; 5; 5 extra ancho; 5 medio; 5 estrecho; 5 estándar; 5 ancho; 5,5; 5,5 extra ancho; 5,5 medio; 5,5 estrecho; 5,5 estándar; 5,5 ancho; 6; 6 extra ancho; 6 medio; 6 estrecho; 6 estándar; 6 ancho; 6,5; 6,5 extra ancho; 6,5 medio; 6,5 estrecho; 6,5 estándar; 6,5 ancho; 7; 7 extra ancho; 7 medio; 7 estrecho; 7 estándar; 7 ancho; 7,5; 7,5 extra ancho; 7,5 medio; 7,5 estrecho; 7,5 estándar; 7,5 ancho; 8; 8 extra ancho; 8 mediano; 8 estrecho; 8 estándar; 8 ancho; 8,5; 8,5 extra ancho; 8,5 mediano; 8,5 estrecho; 8,5 estándar; 8,5 ancho; 9; 9 extra ancho; 9 mediano; 9 estrecho; 9 estándar; 9 ancho; 9,5; 9,5 extra ancho; 9,5 mediano; 9,5 estrecho; 9,5 estándar; 9,5 ancho; Otro
ru: Размер женской обуви US: 10; 10 очень широкий; 10 средний; 10 узкий; 10 стандартный; 10 широкий; 10,5; 10,5 очень широкий; 10,5 средний; 10,5 узкий; 10,5 стандартный; 10,5 широкий; 11; 11 очень широкий; 11 средний; 11 узкий; 11 стандартный; 11 широкий; 11,5; 11,5 очень широкий; 11,5 средний; 11,5 узкий; 11,5 стандартный; 11,5 широкий; 12; 12 очень широкий; 12 средний; 12 узкий; 12 стандартный; 12 широкий; 12,5; 12,5 очень широкий; 12,5 средний; 12,5 узкий; 12,5 стандартный; 12,5 широкий; 13; 13 очень широкий; 13 средний; 13 узкий; 13 стандартный; 13 широкий; 13,5; 13,5 очень широкий; 13,5 средний; 13,5 узкий; 13,5 стандартный; 13,5 широкий; 14; 14 очень широкий; 14 средний; 14 узкий; 14 стандартный; 14 широкий; 3,5; 3,5 очень широкий; 3,5 средний; 3,5 узкий; 3,5 стандартный; 3,5 широкий; 4; 4 очень широкий; 4 средний; 4 узкий; 4 стандартный; 4 широкий; 4,5; 4,5 очень широкий; 4,5 средний; 4,5 узкий; 4,5 стандартный; 4,5 широкий; 5; 5 очень широкий; 5 средний; 5 узкий; 5 стандартный; 5 широкий; 5,5; 5,5 очень широкий; 5,5 средний; 5,5 узкий; 5,5 стандартный; 5,5 широкий; 6; 6 очень широкий; 6 средний; 6 узкий; 6 standard; 6 широкий; 6,5; 6,5 очень широкий; 6,5 средний; 6,5 узкий; 6,5 стандартный; 6,5 широкий; 7; 7 очень широкий; 7 средний; 7 узкий; 7 стандартный; 7 широкий; 7,5; 7,5 очень широкий; 7,5 средний; 7,5 узкий; 7,5 стандартный; 7,5 широкий; 8; 8, очень широкий; 8, средний; 8, узкий; 8, стандартный; 8, широкий; 8,5; 8,5, очень широкий; 8,5, средний; 8,5, узкий; 8,5, стандартный; 8,5, широкий; 9; 9, очень широкий; 9, средний; 9, узкий; 9, стандартный; 9, широкий; 9,5; 9,5, очень широкий; 9,5, средний; 9,5, узкий; 9,5, стандартный; 9,5, широкий; Другое
pl: Rozmiar buta damskiego US: 10; 10 bardzo szeroki; 10 średni; 10 wąski; 10 standardowy; 10 szeroki; 10,5; 10,5 bardzo szeroki; 10,5 średni; 10,5 wąski; 10,5 standardowy; 10,5 szeroki; 11; 11 bardzo szeroki; 11 średni; 11 wąski; 11 standardowy; 11 szeroki; 11,5; 11,5 bardzo szeroki; 11,5 średni; 11,5 wąski; 11,5 standardowy; 11,5 szeroki; 12; 12 bardzo szeroki; 12 średni; 12 wąski; 12 standardowy; 12 szeroki; 12,5; 12,5 bardzo szeroki; 12,5 średni; 12,5 wąski; 12,5 standardowy; 12,5 szeroki; 13; 13 bardzo szeroki; 13 średni; 13 wąski; 13 standardowy; 13 szeroki; 13,5; 13,5 bardzo szeroki; 13,5 średni; 13,5 wąski; 13,5 standardowy; 13,5 szeroki; 14; 14 bardzo szeroki; 14 średni; 14 wąski; 14 standardowy; 14 szeroki; 3,5; 3,5 bardzo szeroki; 3,5 średni; 3,5 wąski; 3,5 standardowy; 3,5 szeroki; 4; 4 bardzo szeroki; 4 średni; 4 wąski; 4 standardowy; 4 szeroki; 4,5; 4,5 bardzo szeroki; 4,5 średni; 4,5 wąski; 4,5 standardowy; 4,5 szeroki; 5; 5 bardzo szeroki; 5 średni; 5 wąski; 5 standardowy; 5 szeroki; 5,5; 5,5 bardzo szeroki; 5,5 średni; 5,5 wąski; 5,5 standardowy; 5,5 szeroki; 6; 6 bardzo szeroki; 6 średni; 6 wąski; 6 standardowy; 6 szeroki; 6,5; 6,5 bardzo szeroki; 6,5 średni; 6,5 wąski; 6,5 standardowy; 6,5 szeroki; 7; 7 bardzo szeroki; 7 średni; 7 wąski; 7 standardowy; 7 szeroki; 7,5; 7,5 bardzo szeroki; 7,5 średni; 7,5 wąski; 7,5 standardowy; 7,5 szeroki; 8; 8 bardzo szerokie; 8 średnie; 8 wąskie; 8 standardowe; 8 szerokie; 8.5; 8.5 bardzo szerokie; 8.5 średnie; 8.5 wąskie; 8.5 standardowe; 8.5 szerokie; 9; 9 bardzo szerokie; 9 średnie; 9 wąskie; 9 standardowe; 9 szerokie; 9.5; 9.5 bardzo szerokie; 9.5 średnie; 9.5 wąskie; 9.5 standardowe; 9.5 szerokie; Inne
nb: Amerikansk skostørrelse for kvinner: 10; 10 ekstra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 ekstra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 ekstra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 ekstra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 ekstra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 ekstra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 ekstra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 ekstra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 ekstra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 ekstra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 ekstra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 ekstra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 ekstra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 ekstra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Annet
ko: 미국 여성 신발 사이즈: 10; 10 매우 넓음; 10 보통; 10 좁음; 10 표준; 10 넓음; 10.5; 10.5 매우 넓음; 10.5 보통; 10.5 좁음; 10.5 표준; 10.5 넓음; 11; 11 매우 넓음; 11 보통; 11 좁음; 11 표준; 11 넓음; 11.5; 11.5 매우 넓음; 11.5 보통; 11.5 좁음; 11.5 표준; 11.5 넓음; 12; 12 매우 넓음; 12 보통; 12 좁음; 12 표준; 12 넓음; 12.5; 12.5 매우 넓음; 12.5 보통; 12.5 좁음; 12.5 표준; 12.5 넓음; 13; 13 매우 넓음; 13 보통; 13 좁음; 13 표준; 13 넓음; 13.5; 13.5 매우 넓음; 13.5 보통; 13.5 좁음; 13.5 표준; 13.5 넓음; 14; 14 매우 넓음; 14 보통; 14 좁음; 14 표준; 14 넓음; 3.5; 3.5 매우 넓음; 3.5 보통; 3.5 좁음; 3.5 표준; 3.5 넓음; 4; 4 매우 넓음; 4 보통; 4 좁음; 4 표준; 4 넓음; 4.5; 4.5 매우 넓음; 4.5 보통; 4.5 좁음; 4.5 표준; 4.5 넓음; 5; 5 매우 넓음; 5 보통; 5 좁음; 5 표준; 5 넓음; 5.5; 5.5 매우 넓음; 5.5 보통; 5.5 좁음; 5.5 표준; 5.5 넓음; 6; 6 매우 넓음; 6 보통; 6 좁음; 6 표준; 6 넓음; 6.5; 6.5 매우 넓음; 6.5 보통; 6.5 좁음; 6.5 표준; 6.5 넓음; 7; 7 매우 넓음; 7 보통; 7 좁음; 7 표준; 7 넓음; 7.5; 7.5 매우 넓음; 7.5 보통; 7.5 좁음; 7.5 표준; 7.5 넓음; 8; 8 엑스트라 와이드; 8 미디엄; 8 내로우; 8 스탠다드; 8 와이드; 8.5; 8.5 엑스트라 와이드; 8.5 미디엄; 8.5 내로우; 8.5 스탠다드; 8.5 와이드; 9; 9 엑스트라 와이드; 9 미디엄; 9 내로우; 9 스탠다드; 9 와이드; 9.5; 9.5 엑스트라 와이드; 9.5 미디엄; 9.5 내로우; 9.5 스탠다드; 9.5 와이드; 기타
pt-PT: Tamanho de calçado feminino dos EUA: 10; 10 extra largo; 10 médio; 10 estreito; 10 padrão; 10 largo; 10,5; 10,5 extra largo; 10,5 médio; 10,5 estreito; 10,5 padrão; 10,5 largo; 11; 11 extra largo; 11 médio; 11 estreito; 11 padrão; 11 largo; 11,5; 11,5 extra largo; 11,5 médio; 11,5 estreito; 11,5 padrão; 11,5 largo; 12; 12 extra largo; 12 médio; 12 estreito; 12 padrão; 12 largo; 12,5; 12,5 extra largo; 12,5 médio; 12,5 estreito; 12,5 padrão; 12,5 largo; 13; 13 extra largo; 13 médio; 13 estreito; 13 padrão; 13 largo; 13,5; 13,5 extra largo; 13,5 médio; 13,5 estreito; 13,5 padrão; 13,5 largo; 14; 14 extra largo; 14 médio; 14 estreito; 14 padrão; 14 largo; 3,5; 3,5 extra largo; 3,5 médio; 3,5 estreito; 3,5 padrão; 3,5 largo; 4; 4 extra largo; 4 médio; 4 estreito; 4 padrão; 4 largo; 4,5; 4,5 extra largo; 4,5 médio; 4,5 estreito; 4,5 padrão; 4,5 largo; 5; 5 extra largo; 5 médio; 5 estreito; 5 padrão; 5 largo; 5,5; 5,5 extra largo; 5,5 médio; 5,5 estreito; 5,5 padrão; 5,5 largo; 6; 6 extra largo; 6 médio; 6 estreito; 6 padrão; 6 largo; 6,5; 6,5 extra largo; 6,5 médio; 6,5 estreito; 6,5 padrão; 6,5 largo; 7; 7 extra largo; 7 médio; 7 estreito; 7 padrão; 7 largo; 7,5; 7,5 extra largo; 7,5 médio; 7,5 estreito; 7,5 padrão; 7,5 largo; 8; 8 Extra largo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Padrão; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extra largo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Padrão; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extra largo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Padrão; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extra largo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Padrão; 9,5 Largo; Outro
it: Numero di scarpa da donna US: 10; 10 extra larga; 10 media; 10 stretta; 10 standard; 10 larga; 10,5; 10,5 extra larga; 10,5 media; 10,5 stretta; 10,5 standard; 10,5 larga; 11; 11 extra larga; 11 media; 11 stretta; 11 standard; 11 larga; 11,5; 11,5 extra larga; 11,5 media; 11,5 stretta; 11,5 standard; 11,5 larga; 12; 12 extra larga; 12 media; 12 stretta; 12 standard; 12 larga; 12,5; 12,5 extra larga; 12,5 media; 12,5 stretta; 12,5 standard; 12,5 larga; 13; 13 extra larga; 13 media; 13 stretta; 13 standard; 13 larga; 13,5; 13,5 extra larga; 13,5 media; 13,5 stretta; 13,5 standard; 13,5 larga; 14; 14 extra larga; 14 media; 14 stretta; 14 standard; 14 larga; 3,5; 3,5 extra larga; 3,5 media; 3,5 stretta; 3,5 standard; 3,5 larga; 4; 4 extra larga; 4 media; 4 stretta; 4 standard; 4 larga; 4,5; 4,5 extra larga; 4,5 media; 4,5 stretta; 4,5 standard; 4,5 larga; 5; 5 extra larga; 5 media; 5 stretta; 5 standard; 5 larga; 5,5; 5,5 extra larga; 5,5 media; 5,5 stretta; 5,5 standard; 5,5 larga; 6; 6 extra larga; 6 media; 6 stretta; 6 standard; 6 larga; 6,5; 6,5 extra larga; 6,5 media; 6,5 stretta; 6,5 standard; 6,5 larga; 7; 7 extra larga; 7 media; 7 stretta; 7 standard; 7 larga; 7,5; 7,5 extra larga; 7,5 media; 7,5 stretta; 7,5 standard; 7,5 larga; 8; 8 extra larga; 8 media; 8 stretta; 8 standard; 8 larga; 8,5; 8,5 extra larga; 8,5 media; 8,5 stretta; 8,5 standard; 8,5 larga; 9; 9 extra larga; 9 media; 9 stretta; 9 standard; 9 larga; 9,5; 9,5 extra larga; 9,5 media; 9,5 stretta; 9,5 standard; 9,5 larga; Altro
sl-SI: Ameriška velikost ženskih čevljev: 10; 10 zelo široko; 10 srednje; 10 ozko; 10 standardno; 10 široko; 10,5; 10,5 zelo široko; 10,5 srednje; 10,5 ozko; 10,5 standardno; 10,5 široko; 11; 11 zelo široko; 11 srednje; 11 ozko; 11 standardno; 11 široko; 11,5; 11,5 zelo široko; 11,5 srednje; 11,5 ozko; 11,5 standardno; 11,5 široko; 12; 12 zelo široko; 12 srednje; 12 ozko; 12 standardno; 12 široko; 12,5; 12,5 zelo široko; 12,5 srednje; 12,5 ozko; 12,5 standardno; 12,5 široko; 13; 13 zelo široko; 13 srednje; 13 ozko; 13 standardno; 13 široko; 13,5; 13,5 zelo široko; 13,5 srednje; 13,5 ozko; 13,5 standardno; 13,5 široko; 14; 14 zelo široko; 14 srednje; 14 ozko; 14 standardno; 14 široko; 3,5; 3,5 zelo široko; 3,5 srednje; 3,5 ozko; 3,5 standardno; 3,5 široko; 4; 4 zelo široko; 4 srednje; 4 ozko; 4 standardno; 4 široko; 4,5; 4,5 zelo široko; 4,5 srednje; 4,5 ozko; 4,5 standardno; 4,5 široko; 5; 5 zelo široko; 5 srednje; 5 ozko; 5 standardno; 5 široko; 5,5; 5,5 zelo široko; 5,5 srednje; 5,5 ozko; 5,5 standardno; 5,5 široko; 6; 6 zelo široko; 6 srednje; 6 ozko; 6 standardno; 6 široko; 6,5; 6,5 zelo široko; 6,5 srednje; 6,5 ozko; 6,5 standardno; 6,5 široko; 7; 7 zelo široko; 7 srednje; 7 ozko; 7 standardno; 7 široko; 7,5; 7,5 zelo široko; 7,5 srednje; 7,5 ozko; 7,5 standardno; 7,5 široko; 8; 8 zelo široko; 8 srednje; 8 ozko; 8 standardno; 8 široko; 8,5; 8,5 zelo široko; 8,5 srednje; 8,5 ozko; 8,5 standardno; 8,5 široko; 9; 9 zelo široko; 9 srednje; 9 ozko; 9 standardno; 9 široko; 9,5; 9,5 zelo široko; 9,5 srednje; 9,5 ozko; 9,5 standardno; 9,5 široko; Drugo
vi: Cỡ giày nữ USD: 10; 10 Rất rộng; 10 Trung bình; 10 Hẹp; 10 Tiêu chuẩn; 10 Rộng; 10,5; 10,5 Rất rộng; 10,5 Trung bình; 10,5 Hẹp; 10,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 10,5 Rộng; 11; 11 Rất rộng; 11 Trung bình; 11 Hẹp; 11 Tiêu chuẩn; 11 Rộng; 11,5; 11,5 Rất rộng; 11,5 Trung bình; 11,5 Hẹp; 11,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 11,5 Rộng; 12; 12 Rất rộng; 12 Trung bình; 12 Hẹp; 12 Tiêu chuẩn; 12 Rộng; 12,5; 12,5 Rất rộng; 12,5 Trung bình; 12,5 Hẹp; 12,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 12,5 Rộng; 13; 13 Rất rộng; 13 Trung bình; 13 Hẹp; 13 Tiêu chuẩn; 13 Rộng; 13,5; 13,5 Rất rộng; 13,5 Trung bình; 13,5 Hẹp; 13,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 13,5 Rộng; 14; 14 Rất rộng; 14 Trung bình; 14 Hẹp; 14 Tiêu chuẩn; 14 Rộng; 3,5; 3,5 Rất rộng; 3,5 Trung bình; 3,5 Hẹp; 3,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 3,5 Rộng; 4; 4 Rất rộng; 4 Trung bình; 4 Hẹp; 4 Tiêu chuẩn; 4 Rộng; 4,5; 4,5 Rất rộng; 4,5 Trung bình; 4,5 Hẹp; 4,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 4,5 Rộng; 5; 5 Rất rộng; 5 Trung bình; 5 Hẹp; 5 Tiêu chuẩn; 5 Rộng; 5,5; 5,5 Rất rộng; 5,5 Trung bình; 5,5 Hẹp; 5,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 5,5 Rộng; 6; 6 Rất rộng; 6 Trung bình; 6 Hẹp; 6 Tiêu chuẩn; 6 Rộng; 6,5; 6,5 Rất rộng; 6,5 Trung bình; 6,5 Hẹp; 6,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 6,5 Rộng; 7; 7 Rất rộng; 7 Trung bình; 7 Hẹp; 7 Tiêu chuẩn; 7 Rộng; 7,5; 7,5 Rất rộng; 7,5 Trung bình; 7,5 Hẹp; 7,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 7,5 Rộng; 8; 8 Rất rộng; 8 Trung bình; 8 Hẹp; 8 Tiêu chuẩn; 8 Rộng; 8,5; 8,5 Rất rộng; 8,5 Trung bình; 8,5 Hẹp; 8,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 8,5 Rộng; 9; 9 Rất rộng; 9 Trung bình; 9 Hẹp; 9 Tiêu chuẩn; 9 Rộng; 9,5; 9,5 Rất rộng; 9,5 Trung bình; 9,5 Hẹp; 9,5 Tiêu chuẩn; 9,5 Rộng; Khác
lt-LT: JAV moteriškų batų dydis: 10; 10 Ypač platus; 10 Vidutinis; 10 Siauras; 10 Standartinis; 10 Platus; 10,5; 10,5 Ypač platus; 10,5 Vidutinis; 10,5 Siauras; 10,5 Standartinis; 10,5 Platus; 11; 11 Ypač platus; 11 Vidutinis; 11 Siauras; 11 Standartinis; 11 Platus; 11,5; 11,5 Ypač platus; 11,5 Vidutinis; 11,5 Siauras; 11,5 Standartinis; 11,5 Platus; 12; 12 Ypač platus; 12 Vidutinis; 12 Siauras; 12 Standartinis; 12 Platus; 12,5; 12,5 Ypač platus; 12,5 Vidutinis; 12,5 Siauras; 12,5 Standartinis; 12,5 Platus; 13; 13 Ypač platus; 13 Vidutinis; 13 Siauras; 13 Standartinis; 13 Platus; 13,5; 13,5 Ypač platus; 13,5 Vidutinis; 13,5 Siauras; 13,5 Standartinis; 13,5 Platus; 14; 14 Ypač platus; 14 Vidutinis; 14 Siauras; 14 Standartinis; 14 Platus; 3,5; 3,5 Ypač platus; 3,5 Vidutinis; 3,5 Siauras; 3,5 Standartinis; 3,5 Platus; 4; 4 Ypač platus; 4 Vidutinis; 4 Siauras; 4 Standartinis; 4 Platus; 4,5; 4,5 Ypač platus; 4,5 Vidutinis; 4,5 Siauras; 4,5 Standartinis; 4,5 Platus; 5; 5 Ypač platus; 5 Vidutinis; 5 Siauras; 5 Standartinis; 5 Platus; 5,5; 5,5 Ypač platus; 5,5 Vidutinis; 5,5 Siauras; 5,5 Standartinis; 5,5 Platus; 6; 6 Ypač platus; 6 Vidutinis; 6 Siauras; 6 Standartinis; 6 Platus; 6,5; 6,5 Ypač platus; 6,5 Vidutinis; 6,5 Siauras; 6,5 Standartinis; 6,5 Platus; 7; 7 Ypač platus; 7 Vidutinis; 7 Siauras; 7 Standartinis; 7 Platus; 7,5; 7,5 Ypač platus; 7,5 Vidutinis; 7,5 Siauras; 7,5 Standartinis; 7,5 Platus; 8; 8 Ypač platus; 8 Vidutinis; 8 Siauras; 8 Standartinis; 8 Platus; 8,5; 8,5 Ypač platus; 8,5 Vidutinis; 8,5 Siauras; 8,5 Standartinis; 8,5 Platus; 9; 9 Ypač platus; 9 Vidutinis; 9 Siauras; 9 Standartinis; 9 Platus; 9,5; 9,5 Ypač platus; 9,5 Vidutinis; 9,5 Siauras; 9,5 Standartinis; 9,5 Platus; Kita
cs: Americká velikost dámské obuvi: 10; 10 extra široké; 10 střední; 10 úzké; 10 standardní; 10 široké; 10,5; 10,5 extra široké; 10,5 střední; 10,5 úzké; 10,5 standardní; 10,5 široké; 11; 11 extra široké; 11 střední; 11 úzké; 11 standardní; 11 široké; 11,5; 11,5 extra široké; 11,5 střední; 11,5 úzké; 11,5 standardní; 11,5 široké; 12; 12 extra široké; 12 střední; 12 úzké; 12 standardní; 12 široké; 12,5; 12,5 extra široké; 12,5 střední; 12,5 úzké; 12,5 standardní; 12,5 široké; 13; 13 extra široké; 13 střední; 13 úzké; 13 standardní; 13 široké; 13,5; 13,5 extra široké; 13,5 střední; 13,5 úzké; 13,5 standardní; 13,5 široké; 14; 14 extra široké; 14 střední; 14 úzké; 14 standardní; 14 široké; 3,5; 3,5 extra široké; 3,5 střední; 3,5 úzké; 3,5 standardní; 3,5 široké; 4; 4 extra široké; 4 střední; 4 úzké; 4 standardní; 4 široké; 4,5; 4,5 extra široké; 4,5 střední; 4,5 úzké; 4,5 standardní; 4,5 široké; 5; 5 extra široké; 5 střední; 5 úzké; 5 standardní; 5 široké; 5,5; 5,5 extra široké; 5,5 střední; 5,5 úzké; 5,5 standardní; 5,5 široké; 6; 6 extra široké; 6 střední; 6 úzké; 6 standardní; 6 široké; 6,5; 6,5 extra široké; 6,5 střední; 6,5 úzké; 6,5 standardní; 6,5 široké; 7; 7 extra široké; 7 střední; 7 úzké; 7 standardní; 7 široké; 7,5; 7,5 extra široké; 7,5 střední; 7,5 úzké; 7,5 standardní; 7,5 široké; 8; 8 extra široké; 8 střední; 8 úzké; 8 standardní; 8 široké; 8,5; 8,5 extra široké; 8,5 střední; 8,5 úzké; 8,5 standardní; 8,5 široké; 9; 9 extra široké; 9 střední; 9 úzké; 9 standardní; 9 široké; 9,5; 9,5 extra široké; 9,5 střední; 9,5 úzké; 9,5 standardní; 9,5 široké; Jiné
pt-BR: Tamanho do sapato feminino nos EUA: 10; 10 Extralargo; 10 Médio; 10 Estreito; 10 Padrão; 10 Largo; 10,5; 10,5 Extralargo; 10,5 Médio; 10,5 Estreito; 10,5 Padrão; 10,5 Largo; 11; 11 Extralargo; 11 Médio; 11 Estreito; 11 Padrão; 11 Largo; 11,5; 11,5 Extralargo; 11,5 Médio; 11,5 Estreito; 11,5 Padrão; 11,5 Largo; 12; 12 Extralargo; 12 Médio; 12 Estreito; 12 Padrão; 12 Largo; 12,5; 12,5 Extralargo; 12,5 Médio; 12,5 Estreito; 12,5 Padrão; 12,5 Largo; 13; 13 Extralargo; 13 Médio; 13 Estreito; 13 Padrão; 13 Largo; 13,5; 13,5 Extralargo; 13,5 Médio; 13,5 Estreito; 13,5 Padrão; 13,5 Largo; 14; 14 Extralargo; 14 Médio; 14 Estreito; 14 Padrão; 14 Largo; 3,5; 3,5 Extralargo; 3,5 Médio; 3,5 Estreito; 3,5 Padrão; 3,5 Largo; 4; 4 Extralargo; 4 Médio; 4 Estreito; 4 Padrão; 4 Largo; 4,5; 4,5 Extralargo; 4,5 Médio; 4,5 Estreito; 4,5 Padrão; 4,5 Largo; 5; 5 Extralargo; 5 Médio; 5 Estreito; 5 Padrão; 5 Largo; 5,5; 5,5 Extralargo; 5,5 Médio; 5,5 Estreito; 5,5 Padrão; 5,5 Largo; 6; 6 Extralargo; 6 Médio; 6 Estreito; 6 Padrão; 6 Largo; 6,5; 6,5 Extralargo; 6,5 Médio; 6,5 Estreito; 6,5 Padrão; 6,5 Largo; 7; 7 Extralargo; 7 Médio; 7 Estreito; 7 Padrão; 7 Largo; 7,5; 7,5 Extralargo; 7,5 Médio; 7,5 Estreito; 7,5 Padrão; 7,5 Largo; 8; 8 Extra largo; 8 Médio; 8 Estreito; 8 Padrão; 8 Largo; 8,5; 8,5 Extra largo; 8,5 Médio; 8,5 Estreito; 8,5 Padrão; 8,5 Largo; 9; 9 Extra largo; 9 Médio; 9 Estreito; 9 Padrão; 9 Largo; 9,5; 9,5 Extra largo; 9,5 Médio; 9,5 Estreito; 9,5 Padrão; 9,5 Largo; Outro
hu: USA nőicipő-méret: 10; 10 extra széles; 10 közepes; 10 keskeny; 10 normál; 10 széles; 10,5; 10,5 extra széles; 10,5 közepes; 10,5 keskeny; 10,5 normál; 10,5 széles; 11; 11 extra széles; 11 közepes; 11 keskeny; 11 normál; 11 széles; 11,5; 11,5 extra széles; 11,5 közepes; 11,5 keskeny; 11,5 normál; 11,5 széles; 12; 12 extra széles; 12 közepes; 12 keskeny; 12 normál; 12 széles; 12,5; 12,5 extra széles; 12,5 közepes; 12,5 keskeny; 12,5 normál; 12,5 széles; 13; 13 extra széles; 13 közepes; 13 keskeny; 13 normál; 13 széles; 13,5; 13,5 extra széles; 13,5 közepes; 13,5 keskeny; 13,5 normál; 13,5 széles; 14; 14 extra széles; 14 közepes; 14 keskeny; 14 normál; 14 széles; 3,5; 3,5 extra széles; 3,5 közepes; 3,5 keskeny; 3,5 normál; 3,5 széles; 4; 4 extra széles; 4 közepes; 4 keskeny; 4 normál; 4 széles; 4,5; 4,5 extra széles; 4,5 közepes; 4,5 keskeny; 4,5 normál; 4,5 széles; 5; 5 extra széles; 5 közepes; 5 keskeny; 5 normál; 5 széles; 5,5; 5,5 extra széles; 5,5 közepes; 5,5 keskeny; 5,5 normál; 5,5 széles; 6; 6 extra széles; 6 közepes; 6 keskeny; 6 normál; 6 széles; 6,5; 6,5 extra széles; 6,5 közepes; 6,5 keskeny; 6,5 normál; 6,5 széles; 7; 7 extra széles; 7 közepes; 7 keskeny; 7 normál; 7 széles; 7,5; 7,5 extra széles; 7,5 közepes; 7,5 keskeny; 7,5 normál; 7,5 széles; 8; 8 extra széles; 8 közepes; 8 keskeny; 8 normál; 8 széles; 8,5; 8,5 extra széles; 8,5 közepes; 8,5 keskeny; 8,5 normál; 8,5 széles; 9; 9 extra széles; 9 közepes; 9 keskeny; 9 normál; 9 széles; 9,5; 9,5 extra széles; 9,5 közepes; 9,5 keskeny; 9,5 normál; 9,5 széles; Egyéb
de: US-Damenschuhgröße: 10; 10 Extra weit; 10 Mittel; 10 Schmal; 10 Standard; 10 Weit; 10,5; 10,5 Extra weit; 10,5 Mittel; 10,5 Schmal; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Weit; 11; 11 Extra weit; 11 Mittel; 11 Schmal; 11 Standard; 11 Weit; 11,5; 11,5 Extra weit; 11,5 Mittel; 11,5 Schmal; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Weit; 12; 12 Extra weit; 12 Mittel; 12 Schmal; 12 Standard; 12 Weit; 12,5; 12,5 Extra weit; 12,5 Mittel; 12,5 Schmal; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Weit; 13; 13 Extra weit; 13 Mittel; 13 Schmal; 13 Standard; 13 Weit; 13,5; 13,5 Extra weit; 13,5 Mittel; 13,5 Schmal; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Weit; 14; 14 Extra weit; 14 Mittel; 14 Schmal; 14 Standard; 14 Weit; 3,5; 3,5 Extra weit; 3,5 Mittel; 3,5 Schmal; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Weit; 4; 4 Extra weit; 4 Mittel; 4 Schmal; 4 Standard; 4 Weit; 4,5; 4,5 Extra weit; 4,5 Mittel; 4,5 Schmal; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Weit; 5; 5 Extra weit; 5 Mittel; 5 Schmal; 5 Standard; 5 Weit; 5,5; 5,5 Extra weit; 5,5 Mittel; 5,5 Schmal; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Weit; 6; 6 Extra weit; 6 Mittel; 6 Schmal; 6 Standard; 6 Weit; 6,5; 6,5 Extra weit; 6,5 Mittel; 6,5 Schmal; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Weit; 7; 7 Extra weit; 7 Mittel; 7 Schmal; 7 Standard; 7 Weit; 7,5; 7,5 Extra weit; 7,5 Mittel; 7,5 Schmal; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Weit; 8; 8 Extra breit; 8 Mittel; 8 Schmal; 8 Standard; 8 Breit; 8,5; 8,5 Extra breit; 8,5 Mittel; 8,5 Schmal; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Breit; 9; 9 Extra breit; 9 Mittel; 9 Schmal; 9 Standard; 9 Breit; 9,5; 9,5 Extra breit; 9,5 Mittel; 9,5 Schmal; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Breit; Sonstiges
da: Britisk skostørrelse for kvinder: 10; 10 ekstra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 ekstra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 ekstra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 ekstra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 ekstra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 ekstra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 ekstra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 ekstra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 ekstra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 3,5; 3,5 ekstra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 ekstra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 ekstra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 ekstra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 ekstra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 ekstra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 ekstra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 ekstra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 ekstra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 Ekstra bred; 8 Medium; 8 Smal; 8 Standard; 8 Bred; 8,5; 8,5 Ekstra bred; 8,5 Medium; 8,5 Smal; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Bred; 9; 9 Ekstra bred; 9 Medium; 9 Smal; 9 Standard; 9 Bred; 9,5; 9,5 Ekstra bred; 9,5 Medium; 9,5 Smal; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Bred; Andet
sv: Skostorlekar kvinnor USA: 10; 10 extra bred; 10 medium; 10 smal; 10 standard; 10 bred; 10,5; 10,5 extra bred; 10,5 medium; 10,5 smal; 10,5 standard; 10,5 bred; 11; 11 extra bred; 11 medium; 11 smal; 11 standard; 11 bred; 11,5; 11,5 extra bred; 11,5 medium; 11,5 smal; 11,5 standard; 11,5 bred; 12; 12 extra bred; 12 medium; 12 smal; 12 standard; 12 bred; 12,5; 12,5 extra bred; 12,5 medium; 12,5 smal; 12,5 standard; 12,5 bred; 13; 13 extra bred; 13 medium; 13 smal; 13 standard; 13 bred; 13,5; 13,5 extra bred; 13,5 medium; 13,5 smal; 13,5 standard; 13,5 bred; 14; 14 extra bred; 14 medium; 14 smal; 14 standard; 14 bred; 3,5; 3,5 extra bred; 3,5 medium; 3,5 smal; 3,5 standard; 3,5 bred; 4; 4 extra bred; 4 medium; 4 smal; 4 standard; 4 bred; 4,5; 4,5 extra bred; 4,5 medium; 4,5 smal; 4,5 standard; 4,5 bred; 5; 5 extra bred; 5 medium; 5 smal; 5 standard; 5 bred; 5,5; 5,5 extra bred; 5,5 medium; 5,5 smal; 5,5 standard; 5,5 bred; 6; 6 extra bred; 6 medium; 6 smal; 6 standard; 6 bred; 6,5; 6,5 extra bred; 6,5 medium; 6,5 smal; 6,5 standard; 6,5 bred; 7; 7 extra bred; 7 medium; 7 smal; 7 standard; 7 bred; 7,5; 7,5 extra bred; 7,5 medium; 7,5 smal; 7,5 standard; 7,5 bred; 8; 8 extra bred; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standard; 8 bred; 8,5; 8,5 extra bred; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standard; 8,5 bred; 9; 9 extra bred; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standard; 9 bred; 9,5; 9,5 extra bred; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standard; 9,5 bred; Övrigt
hr-HR: Veličina ženske obuće (SAD): 10; 10 Iznimno široko; 10 Srednje; 10 Usko; 10 Standardno; 10 Široko; 10,5; 10,5 Iznimno široko; 10,5 Srednje; 10,5 Usko; 10,5 Standardno; 10,5 Široko; 11; 11 Iznimno široko; 11 Srednje; 11 Usko; 11 Standardno; 11 Široko; 11,5; 11,5 Iznimno široko; 11,5 Srednje; 11,5 Usko; 11,5 Standardno; 11,5 Široko; 12; 12 Iznimno široko; 12 Srednje; 12 Usko; 12 Standardno; 12 Široko; 12,5; 12,5 Iznimno široko; 12,5 Srednje; 12,5 Usko; 12,5 Standardno; 12,5 Široko; 13; 13 Iznimno široko; 13 Srednje; 13 Usko; 13 Standardno; 13 Široko; 13,5; 13,5 Iznimno široko; 13,5 Srednje; 13,5 Usko; 13,5 Standardno; 13,5 Široko; 14; 14 Iznimno široko; 14 Srednje; 14 Usko; 14 Standardno; 14 Široko; 3,5; 3,5 Iznimno široko; 3,5 Srednje; 3,5 Usko; 3,5 Standardno; 3,5 Široko; 4; 4 Iznimno široko; 4 Srednje; 4 Usko; 4 Standardno; 4 Široko; 4,5; 4,5 Iznimno široko; 4,5 Srednje; 4,5 Usko; 4,5 Standardno; 4,5 Široko; 5; 5 Iznimno široko; 5 Srednje; 5 Usko; 5 Standardno; 5 Široko; 5,5; 5,5 Iznimno široko; 5,5 Srednje; 5,5 Usko; 5,5 Standardno; 5,5 Široko; 6; 6 Iznimno široko; 6 Srednje; 6 Usko; 6 Standardno; 6 Široko; 6,5; 6,5 Iznimno široko; 6,5 Srednje; 6,5 Usko; 6,5 Standardno; 6,5 Široko; 7; 7 Iznimno široko; 7 Srednje; 7 Usko; 7 Standardno; 7 Široko; 7,5; 7,5 Iznimno široko; 7,5 Srednje; 7,5 Usko; 7,5 Standardno; 7,5 Široko; 8; 8 Iznimno široko; 8 Srednje; 8 Usko; 8 Standardno; 8 Široko; 8,5; 8,5 Iznimno široko; 8,5 Srednje; 8,5 Usko; 8,5 Standardno; 8,5 Široko; 9; 9 Iznimno široko; 9 Srednje; 9 Usko; 9 Standardno; 9 Široko; 9,5; 9,5 Iznimno široko; 9,5 Srednje; 9,5 Usko; 9,5 Standardno; 9,5 Široko; Ostalo
ro-RO: Mărime SUA pentru încălțăminte de damă: 10; 10 Extra lat; 10 Mediu; 10 Îngust; 10 Standard; 10 Lat; 10,5; 10,5 Extra lat; 10,5 Mediu; 10,5 Îngust; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Lat; 11; 11 Extra lat; 11 Mediu; 11 Îngust; 11 Standard; 11 Lat; 11,5; 11,5 Extra lat; 11,5 Mediu; 11,5 Îngust; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Lat; 12; 12 Extra lat; 12 Mediu; 12 Îngust; 12 Standard; 12 Lat; 12,5; 12,5 Extra lat; 12,5 Mediu; 12,5 Îngust; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Lat; 13; 13 Extra lat; 13 Mediu; 13 Îngust; 13 Standard; 13 Lat; 13,5; 13,5 Extra lat; 13,5 Mediu; 13,5 Îngust; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Lat; 14; 14 Extra lat; 14 Mediu; 14 Îngust; 14 Standard; 14 Lat; 3,5; 3,5 Extra lat; 3,5 Mediu; 3,5 Îngust; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Lat; 4; 4 Extra lat; 4 Mediu; 4 Îngust; 4 Standard; 4 Lat; 4,5; 4,5 Extra lat; 4,5 Mediu; 4,5 Îngust; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Lat; 5; 5 Extra lat; 5 Mediu; 5 Îngust; 5 Standard; 5 Lat; 5,5; 5,5 Extra lat; 5,5 Mediu; 5,5 Îngust; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Lat; 6; 6 Extra lat; 6 Mediu; 6 Îngust; 6 Standard; 6 Lat; 6,5; 6,5 Extra lat; 6,5 Mediu; 6,5 Îngust; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Lat; 7; 7 Extra lat; 7 Mediu; 7 Îngust; 7 Standard; 7 Lat; 7,5; 7,5 Extra lat; 7,5 Mediu; 7,5 Îngust; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Lat; 8; 8 Extra lat; 8 Mediu; 8 Îngust; 8 Standard; 8 Lat; 8,5; 8,5 Extra lat; 8,5 Mediu; 8,5 Îngust; 8,5 Standard; 8,5 Lat; 9; 9 Extra lat; 9 Mediu; 9 Îngust; 9 Standard; 9 Lat; 9,5; 9,5 Extra lat; 9,5 Mediu; 9,5 Îngust; 9,5 Standard; 9,5 Lat; Altele
el: Αμερικανικό μέγεθος γυναικείων παπουτσιών: 10; 10 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10 Μεσαίο; 10 Στενό; 10 Κανονικό; 10 Φαρδύ; 10,5; 10,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 10,5 Μεσαίο; 10,5 Στενό; 10,5 Κανονικό; 10,5 Φαρδύ; 11; 11 Πολύ φαρδύ; 11 Μεσαίο; 11 Στενό; 11 Κανονικό; 11 Φαρδύ; 11,5; 11,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 11,5 Μεσαίο; 11,5 Στενό; 11,5 Κανονικό; 11,5 Φαρδύ; 12; 12 Πολύ φαρδύ; 12 Μεσαίο; 12 Στενό; 12 Κανονικό; 12 Φαρδύ; 12,5; 12,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 12,5 Μεσαίο; 12,5 Στενό; 12,5 Κανονικό; 12,5 Φαρδύ; 13; 13 Πολύ φαρδύ; 13 Μεσαίο; 13 Στενό; 13 Κανονικό; 13 Φαρδύ; 13,5; 13,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 13,5 Μεσαίο; 13,5 Στενό; 13,5 Κανονικό; 13,5 Φαρδύ; 14; 14 Πολύ φαρδύ; 14 Μεσαίο; 14 Στενό; 14 Κανονικό; 14 Φαρδύ; 3,5; 3,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 3,5 Μεσαίο; 3,5 Στενό; 3,5 Κανονικό; 3,5 Φαρδύ; 4; 4 Πολύ φαρδύ; 4 Μεσαίο; 4 Στενό; 4 Κανονικό; 4 Φαρδύ; 4,5; 4,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 4,5 Μεσαίο; 4,5 Στενό; 4,5 Κανονικό; 4,5 Φαρδύ; 5; 5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5 Μεσαίο; 5 Στενό; 5 Κανονικό; 5 Φαρδύ; 5,5; 5,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 5,5 Μεσαίο; 5,5 Στενό; 5,5 Κανονικό; 5,5 Φαρδύ; 6; 6 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6 Μεσαίο; 6 Στενό; 6 Κανονικό; 6 Φαρδύ; 6,5; 6,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 6,5 Μεσαίο; 6,5 Στενό; 6,5 Κανονικό; 6,5 Φαρδύ; 7; 7 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7 Μεσαίο; 7 Στενό; 7 Κανονικό; 7 Φαρδύ; 7,5; 7,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 7,5 Μεσαίο; 7,5 Στενό; 7,5 Κανονικό; 7,5 Φαρδύ; 8; 8 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8 Μεσαίο; 8 Στενό; 8 Κανονικό; 8 Φαρδύ; 8,5; 8,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 8,5 Μεσαίο; 8,5 Στενό; 8,5 Κανονικό; 8,5 Φαρδύ; 9; 9 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9 Μεσαίο; 9 Στενό; 9 Κανονικό; 9 Φαρδύ; 9,5; 9,5 Πολύ φαρδύ; 9,5 Μεσαίο; 9,5 Στενό; 9,5 Κανονικό; 9,5 Φαρδύ; Άλλο
zh-TW: 美國女鞋尺寸: 10; 10 特寬; 10 中等; 10 窄; 10 標準; 10 寬; 10.5; 10.5 特寬; 10.5 中等; 10.5 窄; 10.5 標準; 10.5 寬; 11; 11 特寬; 11 中等; 11 窄; 11 標準; 11 寬; 11.5; 11.5 特寬; 11.5 中等; 11.5 窄; 11.5 標準; 11.5 寬; 12; 12 特寬; 12 中等; 12 窄; 12 標準; 12 寬; 12.5; 12.5 特寬; 12.5 中等; 12.5 窄; 12.5 標準; 12.5 寬; 13; 13 特寬; 13 中等; 13 窄; 13 標準; 13 寬; 13.5; 13.5 特寬; 13.5 中等; 13.5 窄; 13.5 標準; 13.5 寬; 14; 14 特寬; 14 中等; 14 窄; 14 標準; 14 寬; 3.5; 3.5 特寬; 3.5 中等; 3.5 窄; 3.5 標準; 3.5 寬; 4; 4 特寬; 4 中等; 4 窄; 4 標準; 4 寬; 4.5; 4.5 特寬; 4.5 中等; 4.5 窄; 4.5 標準; 4.5 寬; 5; 5 特寬; 5 中等; 5 窄; 5 標準; 5 寬; 5.5; 5.5 特寬; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄; 5.5 標準; 5.5 寬; 6; 6 特寬; 6 中等; 6 窄; 6 標準; 6 寬; 6.5; 6.5 特寬; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄; 6.5 標準; 6.5 寬; 7; 7 特寬; 7 中等; 7 窄; 7 標準; 7 寬; 7.5; 7.5 特寬; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄; 7.5 標準; 7.5 寬; 8; 8 特寬; 8 中等; 8 窄; 8 標準; 8 寬; 8.5; 8.5 特寬; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄; 8.5 標準; 8.5 寬; 9; 9 特寬; 9 中等; 9 窄; 9 標準; 9 寬; 9.5; 9.5 特寬; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄; 9.5 標準; 9.5 寬; 其他
fr: Pointure UK pour femme: 10; 10 Très large; 10 Moyen; 10 Étroit; 10 Standard; 10 Large; 10,5; 10,5 Très large; 10,5 Moyen; 10,5 Étroit; 10,5 Standard; 10,5 Large; 11; 11 Très large; 11 Moyen; 11 Étroit; 11 Standard; 11 Large; 11,5; 11,5 Très large; 11,5 Moyen; 11,5 Étroit; 11,5 Standard; 11,5 Large; 12; 12 Très large; 12 Moyen; 12 Étroit; 12 Standard; 12 Large; 12,5; 12,5 Très large; 12,5 Moyen; 12,5 Étroit; 12,5 Standard; 12,5 Large; 13; 13 Très large; 13 Moyen; 13 Étroit; 13 Standard; 13 Large; 13,5; 13,5 Très large; 13,5 Moyen; 13,5 Étroit; 13,5 Standard; 13,5 Large; 14; 14 Très large; 14 Moyen; 14 Étroit; 14 Standard; 14 Large; 3,5; 3,5 Très large; 3,5 Moyen; 3,5 Étroit; 3,5 Standard; 3,5 Large; 4; 4 Très large; 4 Moyen; 4 Étroit; 4 Standard; 4 Large; 4,5; 4,5 Très large; 4,5 Moyen; 4,5 Étroit; 4,5 Standard; 4,5 Large; 5; 5 Très large; 5 Moyen; 5 Étroit; 5 Standard; 5 Large; 5,5; 5,5 Très large; 5,5 Moyen; 5,5 Étroit; 5,5 Standard; 5,5 Large; 6; 6 Très large; 6 Moyen; 6 Étroit; 6 Standard; 6 Large; 6,5; 6,5 Très large; 6,5 Moyen; 6,5 Étroit; 6,5 Standard; 6,5 Large; 7; 7 Très large; 7 Moyen; 7 Étroit; 7 Standard; 7 Large; 7,5; 7,5 Très large; 7,5 Moyen; 7,5 Étroit; 7,5 Standard; 7,5 Large; 8; 8 très large; 8 moyen; 8 étroit; 8 standard; 8 large; 8,5; 8,5 très large; 8,5 moyen; 8,5 étroit; 8,5 standard; 8,5 large; 9; 9 très large; 9 moyen; 9 étroit; 9 standard; 9 large; 9,5; 9,5 très large; 9,5 moyen; 9,5 étroit; 9,5 standard; 9,5 large; Autre
bg-BG: US размер на дамски обувки: 10; 10 Много широк; 10 Среден; 10 Тесен; 10 Стандартен; 10 Широк; 10,5; 10,5 Много широк; 10,5 Среден; 10,5 Тесен; 10,5 Стандартен; 10,5 Широк; 11; 11 Много широк; 11 Среден; 11 Тесен; 11 Стандартен; 11 Широк; 11,5; 11,5 Много широк; 11,5 Среден; 11,5 Тесен; 11,5 Стандартен; 11,5 Широк; 12; 12 Много широк; 12 Среден; 12 Тесен; 12 Стандартен; 12 Широк; 12,5; 12,5 Много широк; 12,5 Среден; 12,5 Тесен; 12,5 Стандартен; 12,5 Широк; 13; 13 Много широк; 13 Среден; 13 Тесен; 13 Стандартен; 13 Широк; 13,5; 13,5 Много широк; 13,5 Среден; 13,5 Тесен; 13,5 Стандартен; 13,5 Широк; 14; 14 Много широк; 14 Среден; 14 Тесен; 14 Стандартен; 14 Широк; 3,5; 3,5 Много широк; 3,5 Среден; 3,5 Тесен; 3,5 Стандартен; 3,5 Широк; 4; 4 Много широк; 4 Среден; 4 Тесен; 4 Стандартен; 4 Широк; 4,5; 4,5 Много широк; 4,5 Среден; 4,5 Тесен; 4,5 Стандартен; 4,5 Широк; 5; 5 Много широк; 5 Среден; 5 Тесен; 5 Стандартен; 5 Широк; 5,5; 5,5 Много широк; 5,5 Среден; 5,5 Тесен; 5,5 Стандартен; 5,5 Широк; 6; 6 Много широк; 6 Среден; 6 Тесен; 6 Стандартен; 6 Широк; 6,5; 6,5 Много широк; 6,5 Среден; 6,5 Тесен; 6,5 Стандартен; 6,5 Широк; 7; 7 Много широк; 7 Среден; 7 Тесен; 7 Стандартен; 7 Широк; 7,5; 7,5 Много широк; 7,5 Среден; 7,5 Тесен; 7,5 Стандартен; 7,5 Широк; 8; 8 Много широк; 8 Среден; 8 Тесен; 8 Стандартен; 8 Широк; 8,5; 8,5 Много широк; 8,5 Среден; 8,5 Тесен; 8,5 Стандартен; 8,5 Широк; 9; 9 Много широк; 9 Среден; 9 Тесен; 9 Стандартен; 9 Широк; 9,5; 9,5 Много широк; 9,5 Среден; 9,5 Тесен; 9,5 Стандартен; 9,5 Широк; Друг
ja: 米国女性用靴の寸法: 10; 10 エクストラワイド; 10 ミディアム; 10 ナロー; 10 スタンダード; 10 ワイド; 10.5; 10.5 エクストラワイド; 10.5 ミディアム; 10.5 ナロー; 10.5 スタンダード; 10.5 ワイド; 11; 11 エクストラワイド; 11 ミディアム; 11 ナロー; 11 スタンダード; 11 ワイド; 11.5; 11.5 エクストラワイド; 11.5 ミディアム; 11.5 ナロー; 11.5 スタンダード; 11.5 ワイド; 12; 12 エクストラワイド; 12 ミディアム; 12 ナロー; 12 スタンダード; 12 ワイド; 12.5; 12.5 エクストラワイド; 12.5 ミディアム; 12.5 ナロー; 12.5 スタンダード; 12.5 ワイド; 13; 13 エクストラワイド; 13 ミディアム; 13 ナロー; 13 スタンダード; 13 ワイド; 13.5; 13.5 エクストラワイド; 13.5 ミディアム; 13.5 ナロー; 13.5 スタンダード; 13.5 ワイド; 14; 14 エクストラワイド; 14 ミディアム; 14 ナロー; 14 スタンダード; 14 ワイド; 3.5; 3.5 エクストラワイド; 3.5 ミディアム; 3.5 ナロー; 3.5 スタンダード; 3.5 ワイド; 4; 4 エクストラワイド; 4 ミディアム; 4 ナロー; 4 スタンダード; 4 ワイド; 4.5; 4.5 エクストラワイド; 4.5 ミディアム; 4.5 ナロー; 4.5 スタンダード; 4.5 ワイド; 5; 5 エクストラワイド; 5 ミディアム; 5 ナロー; 5 スタンダード; 5 ワイド; 5.5; 5.5 エクストラワイド; 5.5 ミディアム; 5.5 ナロー; 5.5 スタンダード; 5.5 ワイド; 6; 6 エクストラワイド; 6 ミディアム; 6 ナロー; 6 スタンダード; 6 ワイド; 6.5; 6.5 エクストラワイド; 6.5 ミディアム; 6.5 ナロー; 6.5 スタンダード; 6.5 ワイド; 7; 7 エクストラワイド; 7 ミディアム; 7 ナロー; 7 スタンダード; 7 ワイド; 7.5; 7.5 エクストラワイド; 7.5 ミディアム; 7.5 ナロー; 7.5 スタンダード; 7.5 ワイド; 8; 8 エキストラワイド; 8 ミディアム; 8 ナロー; 8 スタンダード; 8 ワイド; 8.5; 8.5 エキストラワイド; 8.5 ミディアム; 8.5 ナロー; 8.5 スタンダード; 8.5 ワイド; 9; 9 エキストラワイド; 9 ミディアム; 9 ナロー; 9 スタンダード; 9 ワイド; 9.5; 9.5 エキストラワイド; 9.5 ミディアム; 9.5 ナロー; 9.5 スタンダード; 9.5 ワイド; その他
sk-SK: Veľkosť dámskej obuvi v USA: 10; 10 Extra široké; 10 Stredné; 10 Úzke; 10 Štandardné; 10 Široké; 10,5; 10,5 Extra široké; 10,5 Stredné; 10,5 Úzke; 10,5 Štandardné; 10,5 Široké; 11; 11 Extra široké; 11 Stredné; 11 Úzke; 11 Štandardné; 11 Široké; 11,5; 11,5 Extra široké; 11,5 Stredné; 11,5 Úzke; 11,5 Štandardné; 11,5 Široké; 12; 12 Extra široké; 12 Stredné; 12 Úzke; 12 Štandardné; 12 Široké; 12,5; 12,5 Extra široké; 12,5 Stredné; 12,5 Úzke; 12,5 Štandardné; 12,5 Široké; 13; 13 Extra široké; 13 Stredné; 13 Úzke; 13 Štandardné; 13 Široké; 13,5; 13,5 Extra široké; 13,5 Stredné; 13,5 Úzke; 13,5 Štandardné; 13,5 Široké; 14; 14 Extra široké; 14 Stredné; 14 Úzke; 14 Štandardné; 14 Široké; 3,5; 3,5 Extra široké; 3,5 Stredné; 3,5 Úzke; 3,5 Štandardné; 3,5 Široké; 4; 4 Extra široké; 4 Stredné; 4 Úzke; 4 Štandardné; 4 Široké; 4,5; 4,5 Extra široké; 4,5 Stredné; 4,5 Úzke; 4,5 Štandardné; 4,5 Široké; 5; 5 Extra široké; 5 Stredné; 5 Úzke; 5 Štandardné; 5 Široké; 5,5; 5,5 Extra široké; 5,5 Stredné; 5,5 Úzke; 5,5 Štandardné; 5,5 Široké; 6; 6 Extra široké; 6 Stredné; 6 Úzke; 6 Štandardné; 6 Široké; 6,5; 6,5 Extra široké; 6,5 Stredné; 6,5 Úzke; 6,5 Štandardné; 6,5 Široké; 7; 7 Extra široké; 7 Stredné; 7 Úzke; 7 Štandardné; 7 Široké; 7,5; 7,5 Extra široké; 7,5 Stredné; 7,5 Úzke; 7,5 Štandardné; 7,5 Široké; 8; 8 Extra široké; 8 Stredné; 8 Úzke; 8 Štandardné; 8 Široké; 8,5; 8,5 Extra široké; 8,5 Stredné; 8,5 Úzke; 8,5 Štandardné; 8,5 Široké; 9; 9 Extra široké; 9 Stredné; 9 Úzke; 9 Štandardné; 9 Široké; 9,5; 9,5 Extra široké; 9,5 Stredné; 9,5 Úzke; 9,5 Štandardné; 9,5 Široké; Iné
th: ขนาดรองเท้าผู้หญิงแบบสหรัฐอเมริกา: 10; 10 กว้างพิเศษ; 10 ปานกลาง; 10 แคบ; 10 มาตรฐาน; 10 กว้าง; 10.5; 10.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 10.5 ปานกลาง; 10.5 แคบ; 10.5 มาตรฐาน; 10.5 กว้าง; 11; 11 กว้างพิเศษ; 11 ปานกลาง; 11 แคบ; 11 มาตรฐาน; 11 กว้าง; 11.5; 11.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 11.5 ปานกลาง; 11.5 แคบ; 11.5 มาตรฐาน; 11.5 กว้าง; 12; 12 กว้างพิเศษ; 12 ปานกลาง; 12 แคบ; 12 มาตรฐาน; 12 กว้าง; 12.5; 12.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 12.5 ปานกลาง; 12.5 แคบ; 12.5 มาตรฐาน; 12.5 กว้าง; 13; 13 กว้างพิเศษ; 13 ปานกลาง; 13 แคบ; 13 มาตรฐาน; 13 กว้าง; 13.5; 13.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 13.5 ปานกลาง; 13.5 แคบ; 13.5 มาตรฐาน; 13.5 กว้าง; 14; 14 กว้างพิเศษ; 14 ปานกลาง; 14 แคบ; 14 มาตรฐาน; 14 กว้าง; 3.5; 3.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 3.5 ปานกลาง; 3.5 แคบ; 3.5 มาตรฐาน; 3.5 กว้าง; 4; 4 กว้างพิเศษ; 4 ปานกลาง; 4 แคบ; 4 มาตรฐาน; 4 กว้าง; 4.5; 4.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 4.5 ปานกลาง; 4.5 แคบ; 4.5 มาตรฐาน; 4.5 กว้าง; 5; 5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5 ปานกลาง; 5 แคบ; 5 มาตรฐาน; 5 กว้าง; 5.5; 5.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 5.5 ปานกลาง; 5.5 แคบ; 5.5 มาตรฐาน; 5.5 กว้าง; 6; 6 กว้างพิเศษ; 6 ปานกลาง; 6 แคบ; 6 มาตรฐาน; 6 กว้าง; 6.5; 6.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 6.5 ปานกลาง; 6.5 แคบ; 6.5 มาตรฐาน; 6.5 กว้าง; 7; 7 กว้างพิเศษ; 7 ปานกลาง; 7 แคบ; 7 มาตรฐาน; 7 กว้าง; 7.5; 7.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 7.5 ปานกลาง; 7.5 แคบ; 7.5 มาตรฐาน; 7.5 กว้าง; 8; 8 กว้างพิเศษ; 8 กลาง; 8 แคบ; 8 มาตรฐาน; 8 กว้าง; 8.5; 8.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 8.5 กลาง; 8.5 แคบ; 8.5 มาตรฐาน; 8.5 กว้าง; 9; 9 กว้างพิเศษ; 9 กลาง; 9 แคบ; 9 มาตรฐาน; 9 กว้าง; 9.5; 9.5 กว้างพิเศษ; 9.5 กลาง; 9.5 แคบ; 9.5 มาตรฐาน; 9.5 กว้าง; อื่นๆ
fi: Yhdysvaltojen naisten kenkäkoko: 10; 10 erittäin leveä; 10 normaali; 10 kapea; 10 vakio; 10 leveä; 10,5; 10,5 erittäin leveä; 10,5 normaali; 10,5 kapea; 10,5 vakio; 10,5 leveä; 11; 11 erittäin leveä; 11 normaali; 11 kapea; 11 vakio; 11 leveä; 11,5; 11,5 erittäin leveä; 11,5 normaali; 11,5 kapea; 11,5 vakio; 11,5 leveä; 12; 12 erittäin leveä; 12 normaali; 12 kapea; 12 vakio; 12 leveä; 12,5; 12,5 erittäin leveä; 12,5 normaali; 12,5 kapea; 12,5 vakio; 12,5 leveä; 13; 13 erittäin leveä; 13 normaali; 13 kapea; 13 vakio; 13 leveä; 13,5; 13,5 erittäin leveä; 13,5 normaali; 13,5 kapea; 13,5 vakio; 13,5 leveä; 14; 14 erittäin leveä; 14 normaali; 14 kapea; 14 vakio; 14 leveä; 3,5; 3,5 erittäin leveä; 3,5 normaali; 3,5 kapea; 3,5 vakio; 3,5 leveä; 4; 4 erittäin leveä; 4 normaali; 4 kapea; 4 vakio; 4 leveä; 4,5; 4,5 erittäin leveä; 4,5 normaali; 4,5 kapea; 4,5 vakio; 4,5 leveä; 5; 5 erittäin leveä; 5 normaali; 5 kapea; 5 vakio; 5 leveä; 5,5; 5,5 erittäin leveä; 5,5 normaali; 5,5 kapea; 5,5 vakio; 5,5 leveä; 6; 6 erittäin leveä; 6 normaali; 6 kapea; 6 vakio; 6 leveä; 6,5; 6,5 erittäin leveä; 6,5 normaali; 6,5 kapea; 6,5 vakio; 6,5 leveä; 7; 7 erittäin leveä; 7 normaali; 7 kapea; 7 vakio; 7 leveä; 7,5; 7,5 erittäin leveä; 7,5 normaali; 7,5 kapea; 7,5 vakio; 7,5 leveä; 8; 8 erittäin leveä; 8 keskileveä; 8 kapea; 8 normaali; 8 leveä; 8,5; 8,5 erittäin leveä; 8,5 keskileveä; 8,5 kapea; 8,5 normaali; 8,5 leveä; 9; 9 erittäin leveä; 9 keskileveä; 9 kapea; 9 normaali; 9 leveä; 9,5; 9,5 erittäin leveä; 9,5 keskileveä; 9,5 kapea; 9,5 normaali; 9,5 leveä; Muu
nl: UK schoenmaat dames: 10; 10 Extra breed; 10 Medium; 10 Smal; 10 Standaard; 10 Breed; 10,5; 10,5 Extra breed; 10,5 Medium; 10,5 Smal; 10,5 Standaard; 10,5 Breed; 11; 11 Extra breed; 11 Medium; 11 Smal; 11 Standaard; 11 Breed; 11,5; 11,5 Extra breed; 11,5 Medium; 11,5 Smal; 11,5 Standaard; 11,5 Breed; 12; 12 Extra breed; 12 Medium; 12 Smal; 12 Standaard; 12 Breed; 12,5; 12,5 Extra breed; 12,5 Medium; 12,5 Smal; 12,5 Standaard; 12,5 Breed; 13; 13 Extra breed; 13 Medium; 13 Smal; 13 Standaard; 13 Breed; 13,5; 13,5 Extra breed; 13,5 Medium; 13,5 Smal; 13,5 Standaard; 13,5 Breed; 14; 14 Extra breed; 14 Medium; 14 Smal; 14 Standaard; 14 Breed; 3,5; 3,5 Extra breed; 3,5 Medium; 3,5 Smal; 3,5 Standaard; 3,5 Breed; 4; 4 Extra breed; 4 Medium; 4 Smal; 4 Standaard; 4 Breed; 4,5; 4,5 Extra breed; 4,5 Medium; 4,5 Smal; 4,5 Standaard; 4,5 Breed; 5; 5 Extra breed; 5 Medium; 5 Smal; 5 Standaard; 5 Breed; 5,5; 5,5 Extra breed; 5,5 Medium; 5,5 Smal; 5,5 Standaard; 5,5 Breed; 6; 6 Extra breed; 6 Medium; 6 Smal; 6 Standaard; 6 Breed; 6,5; 6,5 Extra breed; 6,5 Medium; 6,5 Smal; 6,5 Standaard; 6,5 Breed; 7; 7 Extra breed; 7 Medium; 7 Smal; 7 Standaard; 7 Breed; 7,5; 7,5 Extra breed; 7,5 Medium; 7,5 Smal; 7,5 Standaard; 7,5 Breed; 8; 8 extra breed; 8 medium; 8 smal; 8 standaard; 8 breed; 8,5; 8,5 extra breed; 8,5 medium; 8,5 smal; 8,5 standaard; 8,5 breed; 9; 9 extra breed; 9 medium; 9 smal; 9 standaard; 9 breed; 9,5; 9,5 extra breed; 9,5 medium; 9,5 smal; 9,5 standaard; 9,5 breed; Overig
en: US women's shoe size: 10; 10 Extra Wide; 10 Medium; 10 Narrow; 10 Standard; 10 Wide; 10.5; 10.5 Extra Wide; 10.5 Medium; 10.5 Narrow; 10.5 Standard; 10.5 Wide; 11; 11 Extra Wide; 11 Medium; 11 Narrow; 11 Standard; 11 Wide; 11.5; 11.5 Extra Wide; 11.5 Medium; 11.5 Narrow; 11.5 Standard; 11.5 Wide; 12; 12 Extra Wide; 12 Medium; 12 Narrow; 12 Standard; 12 Wide; 12.5; 12.5 Extra Wide; 12.5 Medium; 12.5 Narrow; 12.5 Standard; 12.5 Wide; 13; 13 Extra Wide; 13 Medium; 13 Narrow; 13 Standard; 13 Wide; 13.5; 13.5 Extra Wide; 13.5 Medium; 13.5 Narrow; 13.5 Standard; 13.5 Wide; 14; 14 Extra Wide; 14 Medium; 14 Narrow; 14 Standard; 14 Wide; 3.5; 3.5 Extra Wide; 3.5 Medium; 3.5 Narrow; 3.5 Standard; 3.5 Wide; 4; 4 Extra Wide; 4 Medium; 4 Narrow; 4 Standard; 4 Wide; 4.5; 4.5 Extra Wide; 4.5 Medium; 4.5 Narrow; 4.5 Standard; 4.5 Wide; 5; 5 Extra Wide; 5 Medium; 5 Narrow; 5 Standard; 5 Wide; 5.5; 5.5 Extra Wide; 5.5 Medium; 5.5 Narrow; 5.5 Standard; 5.5 Wide; 6; 6 Extra Wide; 6 Medium; 6 Narrow; 6 Standard; 6 Wide; 6.5; 6.5 Extra Wide; 6.5 Medium; 6.5 Narrow; 6.5 Standard; 6.5 Wide; 7; 7 Extra Wide; 7 Medium; 7 Narrow; 7 Standard; 7 Wide; 7.5; 7.5 Extra Wide; 7.5 Medium; 7.5 Narrow; 7.5 Standard; 7.5 Wide; 8; 8 Extra Wide; 8 Medium; 8 Narrow; 8 Standard; 8 Wide; 8.5; 8.5 Extra Wide; 8.5 Medium; 8.5 Narrow; 8.5 Standard; 8.5 Wide; 9; 9 Extra Wide; 9 Medium; 9 Narrow; 9 Standard; 9 Wide; 9.5; 9.5 Extra Wide; 9.5 Medium; 9.5 Narrow; 9.5 Standard; 9.5 Wide; Other
zh-CN: 美国女士鞋码: 10; 10 特宽; 10 中等; 10 窄; 10 标准; 10 宽; 10.5; 10.5 特宽; 10.5 中等; 10.5 窄; 10.5 标准; 10.5 宽; 11; 11 特宽; 11 中等; 11 窄; 11 标准; 11 宽; 11.5; 11.5 特宽; 11.5 中等; 11.5 窄; 11.5 标准; 11.5 宽; 12; 12 特宽; 12 中等; 12 窄; 12 标准; 12 宽; 12.5; 12.5 特宽; 12.5 中等; 12.5 窄; 12.5 标准; 12.5 宽; 13; 13 特宽; 13 中等; 13 窄; 13 标准; 13 宽; 13.5; 13.5 特宽; 13.5 中等; 13.5 窄; 13.5 标准; 13.5 宽; 14; 14 特宽; 14 中等; 14 窄; 14 标准; 14 宽; 3.5; 3.5 特宽; 3.5 中等; 3.5 窄; 3.5 标准; 3.5 宽; 4; 4 特宽; 4 中等; 4 窄; 4 标准; 4 宽; 4.5; 4.5 特宽; 4.5 中等; 4.5 窄; 4.5 标准; 4.5 宽; 5; 5 特宽; 5 中等; 5 窄; 5 标准; 5 宽; 5.5; 5.5 特宽; 5.5 中等; 5.5 窄; 5.5 标准; 5.5 宽; 6; 6 特宽; 6 中等; 6 窄; 6 标准; 6 宽; 6.5; 6.5 特宽; 6.5 中等; 6.5 窄; 6.5 标准; 6.5 宽; 7; 7 特宽; 7 中等; 7 窄; 7 标准; 7 宽; 7.5; 7.5 特宽; 7.5 中等; 7.5 窄; 7.5 标准; 7.5 宽; 8; 8 特宽; 8 中等; 8 窄; 8 标准; 8 宽; 8.5; 8.5 特宽; 8.5 中等; 8.5 窄; 8.5 标准; 8.5 宽; 9; 9 特宽; 9 中等; 9 窄; 9 标准; 9 宽; 9.5; 9.5 特宽; 9.5 中等; 9.5 窄; 9.5 标准; 9.5 宽; 其他